en: Refrigerated squeezed multifruit juices
de: Gekühlte Multifruchtdirektsäfte
es: Zumos multifruta exprimidos refrigerados, Zumos multifruta exprimido refrigerados
fr: Jus multifruits frais, jus multifruit frais
hr: Ohlađeni cijeđeni sokovi od više voća
lt: Šaltai laikomos spaustų įvairių vaisių sultys
nl: Gekoelde Verse Multivruchtensappen, Gekoelde Verse Multivruchtensap

en: Orange juices
ar: عصير برتقال
ba: Әфлисун һуты
be: Апельсінавы сок
bg: Сок от портокал, Портокалов сок
bo: ཚ་ལུ་མའི་ཁུ་བ།
br: Chug orañjez
ca: Sucs de taronja, Suc de taronja
cs: Pomerančový džus
cy: Sudd oren
da: Appelsinjuicer
de: Orangensäfte, Orangensaft
el: Πορτοκαλάδα
eo: Oranĝsukoj
es: Zumos de naranja, zumos de naranjas, zumo de naranja, Jugo de naranja
et: Apelsinimahl
eu: Laranja-zuku
fa: آب پرتقال
fi: Appelsiinimehut, Appelsiinimehu
fr: Jus d'orange, jus d'oranges
ga: Sú oráistí
gl: Zume de laranxa
he: מיצי תפוזים
hr: Sokovi od naranče, Sok od naranče
hu: Narancslevek, Narancslé, Narancsdzsúsz
hy: Նարնջի հյութ
id: Jus jeruk
is: Appelsínusafi
it: Succo di arancia, Succo d'arancia
ja: オレンジジュース, エドウィン・コリンズ
jv: Jus jeruk
ka: Ფორთოხლის წვენი
ko: 오렌지 주스
lt: Apelsinų sultys, sultys iš apelsinų
mi: Wai ārani
mk: Сок од портокал
my: လိမ္မော်ရည်
nb: Appelsinjuicer, Appelsinjuser
nl: Sinaasappelsappen, Jus d'Oranges, Sinaasappelsap, Jus d'Orange, Sinasappelsap
nn: Appelsinjusar, Appelsinjuicar
oc: Jus d'arange
pa: ਸੰਤਰੇ ਦਾ ਰਸ
pl: Soki pomarańczowe, Sok pomarańczowy
pt: Sumos de laranja, Suco de laranja
ru: Апельсиновые соки, Апельсиновый сок
sa: नारङ्गफलरसः
sk: Pomarančový džús
sl: Pomarančni sok
sr: Sok od pomorandže
sv: Apelsinjuicer
ta: ஆரஞ்சுச் சாறு
th: น้ำส้ม
tr: Portakal suyu
tt: Әфлисун суы
uk: Апельсиновий сік
uz: Apelsin sharbati
vi: Nước cam
yi: מאראנצן זאפט
zh: 橙子汁, 橙汁, 柳橙汁

en: Refrigerated squeezed orange juices
de: Gekühlte Orangendirektsäfte
es: Zumos de naranja exprimidos refrigerados
fr: Jus d'orange frais, jus d'oranges frais
hr: Ohlađeni sokovi od cijeđene naranče
lt: Šaltai laikomos spaustos apelsinų sultys
nl: Gekoelde verse sinaasappelsappen, Gekoelde verse sinaasappelsap

en: Frozen orange juices
fr: Jus d'orange surgelé

en: Squeezed orange juices, Non-refrigerated squeezed orange juices, Pure orange juices
de: Orangendirektsäfte
es: Zumos de naranja exprimidos no refrigerados, Zumos de naranja exprimidos, Zumos de naranja exprimidos ambiente
fi: puristetut appelsiinimehut
fr: Jus d'orange pur jus, jus d'orange 100% pur jus, Jus d'oranges 100% pur jus, 100% pur jus d'oranges, pur jus d'orange
hr: Cijeđeni sokovi od naranče
hu: Facsart narancslevek, Préselt narancslevek
nl: Vers geperste sinaasappelsappen, Vers geperst sinaasappelsap
pt: Sumos de laranja espremida

en: Orange juices (home-made), Orange juice home-made
fr: Jus d'orange maison
hr: Sok od naranče domaći
nl: Sinaasappelsappen (zelfgeperst)

en: Orange juices from concentrate, Orange juices reconstituted from a concentrate
bg: Сок от портокал от концентрат
de: Orangensäfte aus Konzentrat
es: Zumos de naranja procedente de concentrado
fi: appelsiinimehutiivisteet
fr: Jus d'orange à base de concentré
hr: Narančin sok iz koncentrata
hu: Narancslé sűrítményből, Narancslé koncentrátumból
it: Succo di arancia da concentrato
lt: Koncentruotos apelsinų sultys, Apelsinų sultys iš koncentrato
nl: Sinaasappelsappen uit concentraat, Sinaasappelsap uit concentraat

en: Orange juices without pulp
da: Appelsinjuicer uden frugtkød
es: Zumos de naranja sin pulpa
fr: Jus d'orange sans pulpe, Jus d'orange filtrés
nb: Appelsinjuicer uten fruktkjøtt
nn: Appelsinjusar utan fruktkjøt
sv: Apelsinjuicer utan fruktkött

en: Orange juices with pulp
da: Appelsinjuicer med frugtkød
de: Orangensaft mit Fruchtfleisch
es: Zumos de naranja con pulpa
fr: Jus d'orange avec pulpe
hr: Sokovi od naranče s pulpom
it: Succo d'arancia con polpa
lt: Apelsinų sultys su minkštimu
nb: Appelsinjuicer med fruktkjøtt
nl: Sinaasappelsappen met vruchtvlees
nn: Appelsinjusar med fruktkjøt
pl: Soki pomarańczowe z miąższem
sv: Apelsinjuicer med fruktkött

en: Blood orange juices
de: Blutorangensäfte
fr: Jus d'orange sanguine, jus d'oranges sanguines
hr: Sokovi od crvene naranče
hu: Vérnarancslé
it: Succo di arancia rossa, succo di arance rosse, Spremuta di arance rosse
lt: Raudonųjų aplesinų sultys
nl: Bloedsinaasappelsappen, Bloedsinaasappelsap

en: Peach juices
bg: Сок от праскови
de: Pfirsichsäfte, Pfirsichsaft
es: Zumos de melocotón
fi: Persikkamehut
fr: Jus de pêche, jus de pêches
hr: Sokovi od breskve
hu: Őszibaracklevek, Őszibaracklé
it: Succo di pesca
ja: 桃ジュース
lt: Persikų sultys
nl: Perzikensappen, Perzikensap
pl: Soki brzoskwiniowe, Soki z brzoskwini
tr: Şeftali suları
zh: 桃子汁, 桃汁

en: Peach juices from concentrate
bg: Сок от праскова от концентрат
ca: Sucs de préssec procedents de concentrat
da: Ferskensaft fra koncentrat
de: Pfirsichsäfte aus Konzentrat
es: Zumos de melocotón procedente de concentrado
fi: Persikkamehutiivisteet
fr: Jus de pêche à base de concentré, jus de pêches à base de concentré
he: מיצי דלעת מרכזיים
hr: Sokovi breskve iz koncentrata
hu: Őszibaracklé koncentrátumból, Őszibaracklé sűrítményből
it: Succo di pesca da concentrato
ja: 桃ジュース（濃縮還元）
lt: Koncentruotos persikų sultys, Persikų sultys iš koncentrato
nl: Perzikensappen uit concentraat, Perzikensap uit concentraat
pl: Soki brzoskwiniowe z koncentratu
pt: Sumos de pêssego a partir de concentrado
ru: Персиковые соки из концентрата
sv: Persikosjuice från koncentrat
tr: Şeftali suyu konsantre
zh: 桃子汁（浓缩还原）

en: Pear juices
bg: Сок от круши
de: Birnensäfte, Birnensaft
es: Zumos de pera, Zumos de peras
fi: päärynämehut
fr: Jus de poire, jus de poires
hr: Sokovi od kruške
hu: Körtelé, Körtelevek
it: Succo di pera
ja: 梨ジュース
lt: Kriaušių sultys
nl: Perensappen, Perensap
pl: Soki gruszkowe
pt: Sumos de pera
zh: 梨汁

en: Pear juices from concentrate
de: Birnensäfte aus Konzentrat
es: Zumos de pera procedente de concentrado
fr: Jus de poire à base de concentré, jus de poires à base de concentré
hr: Sokovi od krušaka iz koncentrata
hu: Körtelé koncentrátumból, Körtelé sűrítményből
it: Succo di pera da concentrato
lt: Koncentruotos kriaušių sultys, Kriaušių sultys iš koncentrato
nl: Perensappen uit concentraat, Perensap uit concentraat
pt: Sumos concentrados de pera

en: Squeezed pear juices, Non-refrigerated squeezed pear juices
de: Birnendirektsäfte
es: Zumos de pera exprimidos no refrigerados, Zumos de pera exprimidos, Zumos de pera exprimidos ambiente
fr: Jus de poire pur jus
hr: Cijeđene sokove od krušaka
hu: Préselt körtelé
nl: Verse perensappen, Verse perensap

en: strawberry juice
bg: Сок от ягоди
de: Erdbeersäfte, Erdbeersaft
es: Zumos de fresa
fr: Jus de fraise
hr: Sok od jagoda
hu: Eperlevek, Eperlé
ja: イチゴジュース, いちごジュース
lt: Braškių sultys
nl: Aardbeiensappen, Aardbeiensap
pl: Soki truskawkowe

en: Date juices, Date palm juices, Date palm saps, Khejur ras
ar: عصير التمر
bn: খেজুরের রস, খেজুর রস
ca: Saba de palmera
da: Daddeljuicer, Daddelsafter
fr: Jus de datte
sl: Datljev sok
sv: Dadeljuicer, Dadelsafter

en: Cranberry juices, cranberry juice
bg: Сок от червени боровинки
de: Preiselbeersäfte, Preiselbeerensäfte
es: Jugo de arándano
fi: karpalomehu
fr: Jus de canneberge, Jus de cranberry
hr: Sokovi od brusnice
hu: Vörösáfonyalevek, Vörösáfonyalé
it: Succo di mirtillo rosso
ja: クランベリージュース
lt: Spanguolių sultys
nl: Cranberrysappen, Cranberrysap

en: Pineapple juices
bg: Сок от ананас
ca: Suc de pinya
de: Ananassäfte, Ananassaft
es: Zumos de piña
fi: ananasmehut
fr: Jus d'ananas
hr: Sokovi od ananasa
hu: Ananászlevek, Ananászlé
it: Succo di ananas
ja: パイナップルジュース
lt: Ananasų sultys
nl: Ananassappen, Ananassap
pl: Soki ananasowe, sok z ananasa
zh: 菠萝汁

en: Pineapple juices from concentrate, pineapple from concentrate, Pineapple juice reconstituted from a concentrate
bg: Сок от ананас от концентрат
de: Ananassäfte aus Konzentrat
es: Zumos de piña procedente de concentrado
fr: Jus d'ananas à base de concentré
hr: Ananas iz koncentrata
hu: Ananászlé koncentrátumból
it: Succo di ananas da concentrato
lt: Koncentruotos ananasų sultys, Ananasų sultys iš koncentrato
nl: Ananassappen uit concentraat, Ananassap uit concentraat